Washington statutes.
RCW 43.103.080

Travel expenses.

(1) Members of the council shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(2) Attendance at meetings of the council shall constitute performance by a councilmember of the duties of his or her employment or office.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 16 s 8.]